District of Columbia statutes.
47-137

Capital outlay appropriations.

Amounts appropriated under “capital outlay,” together with such amounts previously appropriated under “capital outlay,” shall be available within the appropriations involved without regard to fiscal year project limitations.

July 23, 1959, 73 Stat. 235, Pub. L. 86-104, § 1
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-137.
1973 Ed., § 47-139.